Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-129
University funds; State Treasurer; duties.

The State Treasurer shall be the treasurer of the state university and the custodian of all funds donated to the university or to the Agricultural Research Division by the United States, including the Morrill, Hatch, and Adams funds, all other donations, gifts, and bequests, income from land and productive funds, fees paid by students, and all funds for the use of the university derived from any source, except (1) funds created by taxation and paid into the state treasury as taxes and (2) the University Trust Fund which shall be held and managed in the manner provided by section 85-123.01.

Laws 1907, c. 147, § 1, p. 461;

R.S.1913, § 7109;

C.S.1922, § 6741;

C.S.1929, § 85-127;

R.S.1943, § 85-129;

Laws 1967, c. 622, § 2, p. 2086;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 66.